tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri > Priz Kumandaları ve Sensörleri: Işık Sensörleri; Zamanlayıcı Anahtarları
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema > Kontrole i senzori za zidne utičnice: Senzori za svjetlo; Vremenski prekidači
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα > Έλεγχοι & αισθητήρες πρίζας τοίχου: Αισθητήρες φωτός; Διακόπτες χρονοδιακόπτη
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品 > 壁掛式插座控制組和感應器: 光線感應器; 定時開關
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys > Sieninių lizdų valdikliai ir jutikliai: Šviesos jutikliai; Jungikliai su laikmačiu
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos > Sensores e controles de soquete de parede: Sensores de luz; Interruptores com temporizador
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf > Steckdosen-Zeitschaltuhren & -Sensoren: Lichtsensoren; Zeitschaltuhren
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica > Controlos e sensores de tomada de parede: Sensores de luz; Interruptores de temporizador
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品 > 墙装插座控制器/感应器: 光传感器; 定时开关
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置 > 電気タイマー: 光センサー; タイマースイッチ
sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör > Elektriska timers: Ljussensorer; Timeromkopplare
es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos > Controles y sensores eléctricos: Sensores de luz; Interruptores temporizadores
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품 > 콘센트 제어 장치/센서: 광 센서; 타이머 스위치
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie > Ovládače a senzory nástenných zásuviek: Svetelné senzory; Časové spínače
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies > Wall Socket Controls & Sensors: Light Sensors; Timer Switches
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden > Plugin klokschakelaars en sensoren: Lichtsensoren; Tijdschakelaars
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr > Elektriske timere og sensorer: Lyssensorer; Timerafbrydere
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace > Ovladače a senzory do elektrické zásuvky: Světelné snímače; Časové spínače
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice > Comenzi și senzori pentru prize de perete: Senzori de lumină; Întrerupătoare cu temporizator
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện > Bộ cảm ứng và điều khiển ổ cắm điện gắn tường: Cảm biến ánh sáng; Công tắc hẹn giờ
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи > Управление и сензори за стенни контакти: Светлинни сензори; Електрически ключове с таймер
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema > Krmilniki in senzorji za stenske vtičnice: Senzorji svetlobe; Časovna stikala
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques > Commandes de prises murales et capteurs électriques: Capteurs de lumière; Commutateurs de minuteries
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า > อุปกรณ์ควบคุมและตรวจจับเต้ารับไฟฟ้า: เซนเซอร์ตรวจจับแสง; สวิตช์ตั้งเวลา
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr > Kontroller og sensorer for stikkontakter: Lyssensorer; Timerbrytere
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet > Pistorasian hallintalaitteet ja anturit: Valotunnistimet; Ajastinkytkimet
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения > Таймеры и датчики для розеток: Датчики освещенности; Розетки с таймером
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche > Controlli e sensori per prese: Sensori di luce; Interruttori timer
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne > Kontrolki i sensory do gniazdek: Czujniki światła; Wyłączniki czasowe
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek > Fali aljzatvezérlők és érzékelők: Fényérzékelők; Időzítőkapcsolók